Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Chapter 23 Optometrists

Cross references. —

As to licensing provisions generally, see chapter 1 of this title.

As to nurses, see chapter 21 of this title.

For the Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see chapter 24 of this title.

As to physicians and surgeons, see chapter 26 of this title.

As to eye care practitioners, see chapter 32 of this title.

As to immunity from liability for volunteer health care professionals, see §

1-1-129

.

Stated

in

Paravecchio v. Memorial Hosp., 742 P.2d 1276,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 507

(Wyo. 1987).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

61 Am. Jur. 2d Physicians, Surgeons and Other Healers §§ 7, 30 to 34.

Validity of statute or rule making specified conduct or condition the ground for cancellation or suspension irrespective of licensee's personal fault, 3 ALR2d 107.

Constitutionality of statutes and validity of regulations relating to optometry, 22 ALR2d 939.

What constitutes practice of “optometry,” 88 ALR2d 1290.

Statute authorizing revocation of license upon conviction as applicable to conviction based on plea of nolo contendere or non vult, 89 ALR2d 540.

Disqualification, for bias or interest, of member of occupation or profession sitting in license revocation proceeding, 97 ALR2d 1210.

Practicing medicine, surgery, dentistry, optometry, podiatry, or other healing arts without license as a separate or continuing offense, 99 ALR2d 654.

Comment note on hearsay evidence in proceedings before state administrative agencies, 36 ALR3d 12.

When limitations period begins to run on claim for optometrist's malpractice, 70 ALR4th 600.

What constitutes practice of “optometry,” 82 ALR4th 816.

70 C.J.S. Physicians and Surgeons §§ 1, 17.

§ 33-23-101.
Definitions; authorized scope of practice; prohibited procedures; exceptions.

As used in this act:

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of examiners in optometry;

“License” means a current license to practice optometry in this state issued by the board;

“Licensee” means a person licensed by the board under this act;

“Optometrist” or “doctor of optometry” means a person licensed by the board under this act;

“Physician” means a person holding a valid license issued by the Wyoming state board of medicine under the Medical Practice Act;

“Controlled substance” means any drug, substance or immediate precursor listed in schedules I through V of article III of the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971;

“Ophthalmic lenses” means any type of spectacle or contact lenses;

“Contact lenses” shall include contact lenses with or without power;

“This act” means W.S.

33-23-101

through

33-23-116

.

The practice of optometry occurs when a person employs primary human eye care procedures, including:

The examination, diagnosis and treatment of abnormal conditions and diseases of the eye, its adnexa and visual system;

Measuring the powers and range of vision of the eye to determine the accommodative and refractive state and general function of the eye;

The adaptation, sale, prescribing and dispensing of frames and ophthalmic lenses in all their forms;

Ordering and performance of diagnostic laboratory or imaging tests;

The prescribing and administration of pharmaceutical agents, as provided in W.S.

33-23-102

;

Preoperative and postoperative care for those procedures excluded from the practice of optometry under subsection (c) of this section;

Any laser procedure as set forth by the board’s rules and not excluded under subsection (c) of this section.

The following ophthalmic procedures shall be excluded from the authorized practice of optometry:

The following general procedures:

Administration of general anesthesia;

Surgery performed with general anesthesia.

The following laser procedures:

Corneal procedures;

Procedures of the vitreous chamber of the eye for the purpose of treating any retinal or macular disease;

Retinal procedures.

The following nonlaser procedures:

Surgery related to removal of an eye from a living person;

Surgery of the bony orbit, including orbital implants;

Incisional or excisional surgery of the extraocular muscles;

Surgery of the eyelid for suspected malignancies or for incisional cosmetic or mechanical repair of blepharochalasis, ptosis or tarsorrhaphy;

Incisional or excisional surgery of the lacrimal system other than probing or related procedures;

Surgery requiring full thickness conjunctivoplasty with graft or flap;

Pterygium surgery;

Surgery requiring full thickness incision or excision of the cornea or sclera, other than paracentesis, in an emergency requiring immediate reduction of pressure inside the eye;

Corneal transplants;

Surgery requiring incision of the iris or ciliary body, including diathermy or cryotherapy;

Surgical extraction of the crystalline lens;

Surgical intraocular implants;

Surgery requiring removal of the vitreous;

Procedures of the vitreous chamber of the eye for the purpose of treating any retinal or macular disease, including intra-vitreal injection;

Surgery requiring manipulation of the retina;

Intravenous injections.

The provisions of this chapter do not prevent a physician from treating or fitting glasses to the human eye, or a physician or optometrist from filling prescriptions or orders. Nor do the provisions of this chapter prevent the replacing, duplicating or repairing of ophthalmic lenses or the frames or fittings thereof by persons qualified to write or fill prescriptions or orders under the provisions of this act, nor prevent the doing of the merely mechanical work upon such lenses or upon the frames or fittings thereof.

It is unlawful for any person to dispense, replace or duplicate ophthalmic lenses or any contact lenses without a prescription or order from a physician or optometrist. A contact lens prescription shall specifically state that it is intended for contact lenses and include the type and specification of the contact lenses being prescribed. An optometrist shall provide, at no additional cost to the patient, a written copy of his contact lens prescription. The prescription shall only be released after the contact lenses have been adequately fitted and no more follow-up visits are necessary to assure the contact lenses fit the patient. The essential information necessary to duplicate the prescription shall be defined by rules adopted by the board. All contact lens prescriptions shall have an expiration date after which it shall be unlawful to fill such prescription. The prescribing optometrist shall not be liable for any injury or condition to a patient resulting from negligence in packaging, manufacturing or dispensing lenses by anyone other than the prescribing optometrist. Any person may file a complaint with the board seeking disciplinary action concerning any violation of this subsection. The board shall investigate or cause to be investigated and shall resolve a complaint on its own motion or upon receipt of a written complaint as provided by W.S.

33-23-110

. No person shall improperly fill a contact lens prescription or fill an expired prescription.

The provisions of this chapter do not prohibit the sale of goggles, sunglasses, colored glasses or occupational eye-protective devices if they do not have refractive values, nor do the provisions of this act prohibit the sale of complete ready-to-wear eyeglasses as merchandise by any person not holding himself out as competent to examine, test or prescribe for the human eye or its refractive errors.

Nothing in this act shall prevent an optometrist from using assistants in his practice under his general supervision as defined in board rule.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 2; C.S. 1945, § 37-1802; W.S. 1957, § 33-292; Laws 1977, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 51, § 2; 1987, ch. 139, § 1; 1995, ch. 42, § 1; 2003, ch. 116, § 2; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to eye care practitioners, see chapter 32 of this title.

The 2005 amendment

added (a), redesignating the following subsections accordingly; in (c) substituted “physician” for “duly licensed physician, surgeon, oculist” or similar language; in (d) rewrote provisions pertaining to contact lenses; and rewrote (f).

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "; authorized scope of practice; prohibited procedures;" for "and" in the section heading; substituted "33-23-116" for "33-23-117" in (a)(ix); rewrote (b), which read, "The practice of optometry is the employment of any means other than the use of therapeutic lasers or surgery for diagnosing and treating ocular pathology and for the measurement of the powers or range of human vision or the determination of the accommodative and refractive status of the human eye or the scope of its functions in general or the adaptation of lenses or frames for the aid thereof."; added (b)(i) through (b)(vii); added (c); and redesignated former (c) through (f) as (d) through (g).

Quoted

in

Wyoming State Bd. of Exmrs. of Optometry v. Pearle Vision Ctr., Inc., 767 P.2d 969,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 3

, 82 A.L.R.4th 781 (Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Fitting of contact lenses as practice of optometry, 77 ALR3d 817.

§ 33-23-102.
Optometrist’s use of certain drugs; limitation.

An optometrist shall be allowed to administer and prescribe pharmaceutical agents related to the practice of optometry for the treatment of ocular disease, excluding schedule I and II narcotics, but allowing for the prescribing of hydrocodone or hydrocodone containing pharmaceutical agents regardless of schedule.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 17, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-292.1; Laws 1987, ch. 139, § 1; 1995, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

deleted references “licensed according to the statutes of the state of Wyoming” or similar language three times.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section, which read, "An optometrist shall be allowed to administer and prescribe pharmaceutical agents related to the practice of optometry, excluding the following categories of oral medications: immunosuppressives, steroids, anti-fungals, sedative-hypnotics, and schedule I and II narcotics. No medication shall be given by injection. Oral anti-glaucoma medications may be administered for a period not to exceed forty-eight (48) hours. An optometrist who administers or prescribes pharmaceutical agents for examination or for treatment shall provide the same standard of care to patients as that provided by a physician utilizing the same pharmaceutical agents for examination or treatment."

§ 33-23-103.
License required; civil suit; damages.

It is unlawful for any person in the state of Wyoming to practice or attempt to practice optometry or to advertise, or hold himself out as qualified to fit or adjust any lenses or lens in any manner or form as an aid to human eyesight, without first obtaining a license to practice optometry.

A person who is damaged by another person who violates this section may in addition to other remedies provided by law, institute suit in the county where the violation occurred to require enforcement by injunctive procedures and to recover damages plus court costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.

A person who is attending an optometry school accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization which is recognized or approved by the United States Department of Education (USDE) or the Council on Higher Education Accreditation (CHEA), or their successor agencies, may practice optometry while doing an externship for said school under the direct supervision of an optometrist or physician licensed in this state.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 37-1801; W.S. 1957, § 33-293; Laws 1983, ch. 51, § 2; 2005, ch. 59, § 1.

The 2005 amendment

in (a), substituted “license” for “certificate”, and added (c).

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

Not unlawful to market optical products, services. —

A corporation, which entered into a franchise agreement with a certified optometrist for the marketing of optical products and services, was not engaged in the unlawful practice of optometry, where the corporation did not purport to direct or control the conduct of the optometrist's practice of optometry in any way. Wyoming State Bd. of Examiners of Optometry v. Pearle Vision Ctr., 767 P.2d 969,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 33-23-104.
Board of examiners in optometry; created; composition; designation; duties generally; appointment; qualifications and terms of members; vacancies; oath.

The Wyoming state board of examiners in optometry is created to carry out the purposes and enforce the provisions of this act. The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor and shall include three (3) licensed optometrists, one (1) member of the public and one (1) licensed health care professional other than a licensed optometrist. The terms of the office of the members appointed shall be three (3) years or until their successors have qualified. Each member of the board shall be a resident of the state of Wyoming and each optometrist member of the board shall have been engaged in the actual practice of optometry in the state for at least one (1) year prior to appointment. The governor shall make all appointments to fill vacancies caused by death, resignation or removal. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The members of the board, before entering upon their duties, shall take and subscribe to the oath required to be taken by state officers and shall file the oath in the office of the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 3; C.S. 1945, § 37-1803; W.S. 1957, § 33-294; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to constitutional oath of office, see art. 6, §§ 20 and 21, Wyo. Const.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the second sentence as the second through fourth sentences, adding provisions for appointment for 2005 and beyond.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "five (5)" for "three (3)" in the second sentence, deleted the former third sentence, which read, "In 2005, one (1) board member shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years, one (1) board member shall be appointed for a term of two (2) years and one (1) board member shall be appointed for a term of one (1) year," in the former fourth sentence, substituted "and shall include three (3) licensed optometrists, one (1) member of the public and one (1) licensed health care professional other than a licensed optometrist" for "Thereafter," added "each optometrist member of the board" following "of Wyoming and" in the current fourth sentence and made related changes.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-23-101(a)(ix).

§ 33-23-105.
Board of examiners in optometry; officers; powers of members; meetings; quorum; records.

The board shall annually elect officers. Each member of the board shall have the power, during his term of office to administer oaths and take affidavits, certifying thereto under his hand and seal provided and kept by the board. The board shall meet at least once in each year, for the purpose of holding an examination, and in addition thereto, upon the call of the president or request of a majority of its members. A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum. The secretary shall keep a complete record of the proceedings of the board, which record shall be open to public inspection at all reasonable times.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 37-1804; W.S. 1957, § 33-295; Laws 1995, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to officers authorized to administer oaths, see §

1-2-102

.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the first sentence, and rewrote the third sentence to allow for meetings not only upon the call of the president but also upon call of a majority of members.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

§ 33-23-106.
Board of examiners in optometry; compensation of members; disposition of funds.

Each member of the board may receive as compensation the sum paid each day to members of the state legislature for each day spent in board meetings and per diem and mileage as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii). Expenses shall be paid from the fees and assessments received under the provisions of this act. All fees, assessments and other monies, except fines and penalties, received under the provisions of this act, may be used for meeting the expenses of the board and in carrying out the provisions of this act. In no event shall any expenses be charged against the state.

All money shall be received and collected as provided by law. The state treasurer shall credit the money to a separate account.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 10; C.S. 1945, § 37-1810; Laws 1957, ch. 56, § 3; ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-296; Laws 1973, ch. 179, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2014 ch. 69, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to meal, lodging and traveling expenses of state officers and employees, see §

9-3-102

.

As to amount of mileage fee or mileage expense to state, county or precinct officer or employee, see §

9-3-103

.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 59, § 1, in (a) substituted “the sum paid each day to members of the state legislature for each day spent in board meetings and per diem and mileage as is paid state employees” for “ten dollars ($10.00) for each day actually engaged in the duties of his office, and per diem and mileage as is allowed state officers,” and substituted “monies” for “moneys.”

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, in (b) substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the earmarked revenue fund.”

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments by both 2005 acts.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a), substituted “as provided in W.S. 33-1-302(a)(vii)” for “as is paid state employees” in the first sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in (a), deleted ", fines" following "fees" in the second and third sentences, added ", except fines and penalties," in the fourth sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-23-101(a)(ix).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 33-23-107.
Board of examiners in optometry; report to governor.

The board shall, as required by W.S.

9-2-1014

, report to the governor.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 11; C.S. 1945, § 37-1811; W.S. 1957, § 33-297; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1.

§ 33-23-108.
Board of examiners in optometry; seal.

The board shall provide a seal which shall contain the words, “Wyoming State Board of Examiners in Optometry, Official Seal”.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 13; C.S. 1945, § 37-1813; W.S. 1957, § 33-298.

§ 33-23-109.
Examinations; licensure; qualifications; reciprocity.

Any applicant for licensure under this act is required to pass the examination series administered by the National Board of Examiners in Optometry, or its successor agency, or any other examination specified by the board in rule. The applicant shall be a graduate of an optometric school or college accredited by a regional or professional accreditation organization which is recognized or approved by the council on postsecondary accreditation or the United States Department of Education (USDE) or the Council on Higher Education Accreditation (CHEA), or their successor agencies. Examinations shall cover subjects designated by the board.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 78, § 2.

In addition to satisfying the requirements under subsection (a) of this section, an applicant for licensure under this act shall provide the board fingerprints and other information necessary for a criminal history record background check as provided under W.S.

7-19-201

.

The board of examiners, pursuant to W.S.

33-1-201

, shall establish fees for the standard examination, initial license and the annual renewal of the license. Every optometrist who desires to continue the practice of optometry shall annually, on or before April 1, pay the board the required renewal fee. A license which has expired due to failure to renew may be reinstated by the board upon receipt of the renewal fee and reinstatement and late fees set by the board in accordance with W.S.

33-1-201

provided the request for reinstatement is received in the board office no later than June 30 of the year in which the license expired. An optometrist who previously notified the board that he had retired may renew his license by submitting renewal fees for each year in which no license was issued and a reinstatement fee within three (3) years of the expiration date of the last license held. Upon retirement from active practice, an optometrist shall notify the board in writing.

The board may issue a license by endorsement to engage in the practice of optometry to an applicant who is currently licensed in another United States or Canadian jurisdiction with substantially equivalent requirements as Wyoming and who meets Wyoming requirements for licensure by endorsement. Applicants for licensure by endorsement shall comply with standards set forth in board rules.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 37-1805; W.S. 1957, § 33-299; Laws 1973, ch. 213, § 2; 1975, ch. 22, § 2; 1976, ch. 14, § 1; 1977, ch. 17, § 2; 1987, ch. 139, § 1; 1992, ch. 56, § 2; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the section to provide the requirements for licensure, adding the requirement for fingerprinting and allowing for reciprocal licensure.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section heading, which read, "Examinations required of applicants for licensure; qualifications; existing practitioners, passing grade; reexamination; fees; renewal of license; retirement"; in (a), substituted "or" for "and" preceding "any other" in the first sentence and deleted the last sentence, which read, "Any currently licensed person intending to employ diagnostic or therapeutic pharmaceutical agents in his practice is required to complete and pass a board approved course pertaining to the use of those agents"; and substituted "satisfying the requirements under subsection (a)" for "subsections (a) and (b)" in (c).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b), which read, "No applicant shall be passed by the board who fails to obtain a grade of seventy-five percent (75%) in every subject upon which he is examined. If any applicant fails to pass any examination, he shall be examined at the next or any succeeding examination only in the subject in which he failed to obtain a grade of eighty-five percent (85%). The applicant shall apply for his license within six (6) months after he has satisfactorily passed the examination or the examination shall be of no effect. Before engaging in the practice of optometry, and after the license has been delivered to him, each licensed optometrist shall notify the board in writing of the place where he intends to begin practice and of any subsequent changes of his office location. Notices given to him by the board shall be given by mailing to that address."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-23-101(a)(ix).

§ 33-23-110.
Refusal, suspension or revocation of license.

The board may suspend, revoke or refuse to issue a license to any person who has been guilty of unprofessional and dishonest conduct, unethical conduct, conduct likely to deceive the public or failure to timely submit a renewal application.

“Unprofessional and dishonest conduct” as used in this act means:

The loaning of his license by any licensed optometrist to any person; the employment of “cappers” or “steerers” to obtain business, “splitting” or dividing a fee with any person or persons, the advertising by any means whatsoever of optometric practice or treatment or advice in which untruthful, improbable, misleading or impossible statements are made;

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 42, § 2.

Being guilty of offenses that relate to the practice of optometry or to the ability to practice optometry or involving habitual intemperance, or being habitually addicted to the use of morphine, opium, cocaine, or other drugs having a similar effect;

The obtaining of any fee by intentional fraud or intentional misrepresentation or false pretenses;

The use of any other term by a person licensed under this act except the term “optometrist” or “doctor of optometry” to designate his profession;

Employing either directly or indirectly any suspended or unlicensed optometrist to perform any work covered by the practice of optometry;

Incompetence, malpractice or unethical conduct;

Knowingly making any false statement of any material fact in any application or other instrument required by law to be filed with the board;

The board may clarify definitions stated in this subsection by properly promulgated rules and regulations.

Board disciplinary proceedings will be conducted in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and the rules and regulations of the board.

and (e) Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 2.

Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 6; C.S. 1945, § 37-1806; Laws 1957, ch. 56, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-300; Laws 1995, ch. 42, § 2; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2005, ch. 59, §§ 1, 2; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2018 ch. 107, § 2, effective July 1, 2018.

Cross references. —

As to perjury generally, see §

6-5-301

et seq.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the section, adding disciplinary actions that the board might take and adding behaviors which might warrant such, and repealing procedural provisions in former (d) and (e), instead providing that proceedings will be conducted pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act and board rules and regulations.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2006 amendment,

deleted “Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section” in (f).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b)(iii), substituted "that relate to the practice of optometry or to the ability to practice optometry or involving" for "Involving moral turpitude," following "Being guilty of offenses."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-23-101(a)(ix).

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting Legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Marketing of optical products not prohibited. —

A franchise agreement for the marketing of optical products and services, entered into between a certificated optometrist and a corporation, did not violate the statutory prohibitions against fee splitting or the employment of a “steerer.” Wyoming State Bd. of Examiners of Optometry v. Pearle Vision Ctr., 767 P.2d 969,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1989).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law, Wyoming Style,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 223 (1983).

§ 33-23-111.
Limitation on rights conferred by license; prohibited acts.

Nothing in this act shall be construed as conferring on the holder of a license issued by the board, the title “doctor of medicine,” “ophthalmologist,” or any other word or abbreviation indicating that he is engaged in the practice of medicine.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 78, § 2.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 37-1807; Laws 1957, ch. 56, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 33-301; Laws 1977, ch. 17, § 2; 1983, ch. 51, § 2; 1987, ch. 139, § 1; 1995, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), substituted “a license” for “any certificate of registration” and deleted “oculist” from the list of titles; rewrote (b)(iv); and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b), which read, "It is unlawful: (i) For any person to approach any place of employment either in person or through agents for the purpose of selling ophthalmic lenses, eye examinations or optometric services; (ii) For any person to advertise prescription eyeglasses or contact lenses, which correct visual deficiencies or defects, frames or their supporting accessories or professional services in a false, deceptive or misleading manner; (iii) For any person to make a sworn statement or affidavit in connection with any matter relating to this act proven to be false; (iv) For any person not holding a license to practice optometry."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 33-23-101(a)(ix).

Not unlawful to market optical products, services. —

A corporation, which entered into a franchise agreement with a certified optometrist for the marketing of optical products and services, was not engaged in the unlawful practice of optometry, where the corporation did not purport to direct or control the conduct of the optometrist's practice of optometry in any way. Wyoming State Bd. of Examiners of Optometry v. Pearle Vision Ctr., 767 P.2d 969,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 33-23-112.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 42, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1939, ch. 63 § 8, related to filing requirements for certificates of registration.

§ 33-23-113.
Advertising and display of license requirements.

An advertisement for the practice of optometry shall identify the license held pursuant to this act. The advertisement shall be free from deceptive or misleading information.

To communicate to the patient the license held pursuant to this act, a licensee shall:

Wear a photo identification name tag during patient encounters. The photo identification name tag shall include a photograph of the licensee, the licensee’s name, and the license held pursuant to this act. The name tag shall be of a sufficient size for a patient to read the contents of the tag and shall be worn in a manner so as to be visible and apparent to the patient;

Display the license certificate issued by the board, in its entirety, in a conspicuous place in his office, wherein the practice of optometry is conducted;

Comply with these requirements in each practice setting.

A licensee who enters into a collaborative practice agreement with a medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy shall conspicuously post in each office the regularly scheduled hours the medical doctor or doctor of osteopathy intends to be physically present in the office.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 9; C.S. 1945, § 37-1809; W.S. 1957, § 33-303; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “license” for “certificate” or similar language, and deleted the former last sentence, pertaining to issuing a receipt in the case where work was not done in his office.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section heading, which read, "License to be displayed"; and rewrote the section, which read, "Every person holding a license to practice optometry in the state of Wyoming shall display the license, in its entirety, in a conspicuous place in his office, wherein the practice of optometry is conducted."

§ 33-23-114.
Continuing education courses required.

All optometrists shall take courses of study in subjects relating to the practice of the profession of optometry for the utilization and application of new techniques, scientific and clinical advances, and achievements of research which will assure expansive and comprehensive care to the public. The board shall determine the requirements for continuing education pursuant to rules promulgated by the board. The board may use up to one-half (1/2) of its annual renewal fees for the purposes of contracting with institutions of higher learning, professional organizations, or qualified individuals to provide educational programs that meet this requirement. The board may also treat funds set aside for the purpose of continuing education as state funds for the purpose of accepting any funds made available under federal law on a matching basis for the programs of continuing education.

History.

Laws 1975, ch. 22, § 1; 1995, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2019 ch. 153, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

deleted “registered” preceding “optometrist” twice, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added the eighth sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted “determine the requirements for continuing education pursuant to rules promulgated by” for “prescribe the length of study. Attendance shall be at a course or courses approved by the board. Attendance at any course or courses of study is to be certified to the board upon a form provided by the board and submitted by each optometrist to” in the second sentence and deleted the former last three sentences, which read, “In no instance may the board require a greater number of hours of study than are available at approved courses held within this state. The board shall require three (3) hours of continuing education related to the responsible prescribing of controlled substances every two (2) years. The board may waive the requirements of this section in cases of certified illness or undue hardship.”

§ 33-23-115.
Penalty; injunction; civil penalty; jury trial.

Any person who violates any provision of this act is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) or imprisoned not more than six (6) months in the county jail, or both.

Any person aggrieved by a violation of this act, the Wyoming state board of examiners of optometry, the attorney general or the district or county attorney may institute suit in the county in which a violation of this act occurred to require enforcement by injunctive procedures and to recover a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) per violation, plus costs.

Where a civil penalty is sought the defendant shall be entitled to a jury trial.

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 63, § 12; C.S. 1945, § 37-1812; W.S. 1957, § 33-304; Laws 1983, ch. 51, § 2; 2005, ch. 59, § 1; 2021 ch. 78, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “33-23-117” for “33-23-116” throughout the section; and in (a), added “or both” at the end.

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "this act" for "W.S.

33-23-101

through

33-23-117

" in (a) and twice in (b).

Severability. —

Section 14, ch. 63, Laws 1939 reads: “The legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act and each and every section, subsection, sentence, clause and phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases thereof may be declared unconstitutional.”

Repealing clauses. —

Section 15, ch. 63, Laws 1939, repealed R.S. 1931, §§ 79-101 to 79-115 (Laws 1917, ch. 35), which also regulated the practice of optometry.

§ 33-23-116.
Rules and regulations.

The board may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 51, § 1; 2005, ch. 59, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming state board of examiners in optometry, see §

33-23-104

.

The 2005 amendment

rewrote the section which formerly read: “The board may make rules and regulations not inconsistent with law as may be reasonably necessary for the proper performance of its duties.”

Laws 2005, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2005.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).